Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 603. PROVISION OF DOCUMENTS AND FEES OF OFFICE

Sec. 603.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "document" includes any instrument, paper, or other record.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.002. COPIES OF DOCUMENTS AVAILABLE TO PUBLIC. The secretary of state, Commissioner of the General Land Office, comptroller, commissioner of agriculture, Banking Commissioner, state librarian, or attorney general:

(1) shall furnish to a person on request a certified copy, under seal, of any document in the officer's office that is available under law to that person; and

(2) may not demand or collect a fee from an officer of the state for a copy of any document in the respective offices or for a certificate in relation to a matter in the respective offices if the copy is required in the performance of an official duty of the office of the state officer requesting the copy.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 8.38, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 603.003. COPIES FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO MILITARY SERVICE. (a) A county clerk, district clerk, or other public official on request shall furnish without cost to a person or the person's guardian, dependent, or heir one or more certified copies of a document that is in the custody of or on file in the county clerk's, district clerk's, or other public official's office if:

(1) the person or the person's guardian, dependent, or heir is eligible to make a claim against the United States government because of service in the United States armed forces or an auxiliary service, including the maritime service or the merchant marine; and

(2) the document is necessary to prove the claim.

(b) The issuance of a certified copy under this section may not be considered in determining the maximum fee of the office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.004. FEES FOR CERTIFICATES OR COPIES OF DOCUMENTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the secretary of state, land commissioner, comptroller, commissioner of agriculture, Banking Commissioner, state librarian, attorney general, or other officer of the state or a head of a state department shall collect the following fees for the following services:

(1) a copy, other than a photographic copy, of a document in an office in English, for each page or fraction of a page, $1.50;

(2) a copy, other than a photographic copy, of a document in an office in a language other than English, for each page or fraction of a page, $2;

(3) a translated copy of a document in an office, the greater of $.03 for each word or $5;

(4) a copy of a plat or map in an office, a fee the officer of the office in which the copy is made may establish with reference to the amount of labor, supplies, and materials required; or

(5) a sealed certificate affixed to a copy, including a certificate affixed to a photographic copy, $1.

(b) The state librarian may charge for a photographic copy a fee determined by the Texas State Library and Archives Commission with reference to the amount of labor, supplies, and materials required.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.005. FEE FOR ACKNOWLEDGMENT. An officer who is authorized by law to take acknowledgment or proof of a deed or other written instrument shall receive the same fee a notary public may receive for the same service.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.006. FEE BOOK. An officer who by law may charge a fee for a service shall keep a fee book and shall enter in the book all fees charged for services rendered.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.007. BILL FOR FEES. A fee under this chapter is not payable to a person until a clerk or officer produces, or is ready to produce, a bill in writing containing the details of the fee to the person who owes the fee. The bill must be signed by the clerk or officer to whom the fee is due or who charges the fee or by the successor in office or legal representative of the clerk or officer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.008. POSTING OF FEES REQUIRED. A county judge, clerk of a district or county court, sheriff, justice of the peace, constable, or notary public shall keep posted at all times in a conspicuous place in the respective offices a complete list of fees the person may charge by law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 603.009. DISPOSITION OF FEES. (a) Except as provided by this section, an officer required to collect a fee under Section 603.004 shall deposit the fee in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.61, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) The Texas Employment Commission shall deposit fees in accordance with federal law.

(d) The Texas State Library and Archives Commission shall retain fees collected under this chapter by the state librarian.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.61, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 603.010. OVERCHARGING OF FEES; PENALTY. An officer named in this chapter who demands and receives a higher fee than authorized under this chapter or a fee that is not authorized under this chapter is liable to the aggrieved person for four times the amount unlawfully demanded and received.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.